algorithms/persian.sbl
  // --- Lexical "-AN" suffix list.
  //     Small curated set of stems ending in orthographic -AN that are not plural.
  //     Used by `Protect_Lexical_AN` to prevent stripping on place names / lexical nouns.
  define AN_LexHash as (
    substring among (
      '{aa}{lam}{mim}{alef}{nun}'                    ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // alman
      '{aa}{sin}{alef}{nun}'                         ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // asan
      '{aa}{sin}{mim}{alef}{nun}'                    ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // asman
      '{alef}{ye}{mim}{alef}{nun}'                   ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // eiman
      '{alef}{ye}{shin}{alef}{nun}'                  ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // ishan
      '{alef}{ye}{re}{alef}{nun}'                    ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // iran
      '{alef}{mim}{kaf}{alef}{nun}'                  ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // emkan
      '{alef}{nun}{sin}{alef}{nun}'                  ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // ensan
      '{alef}{sad}{fe}{heh}{alef}{nun}'              ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // esfahan
      '{aa}{zal}{re}{be}{alef}{ye}{jim}{alef}{nun}'  ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // azerbaijan
      '{be}{ye}{alef}{nun}'                          ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // bayan
      '{pe}{alef}{ye}{alef}{nun}'                    ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // payan
      '{pe}{ye}{mim}{alef}{nun}'                     ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // payman
      '{te}{heh}{re}{alef}{nun}'                     ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // tehran
      '{jim}{re}{ye}{alef}{nun}'                     ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // jaryan
      '{dal}{re}{mim}{alef}{nun}'                    ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // darman
      '{dal}{vav}{re}{alef}{nun}'                    ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // dowran
      '{dal}{ye}{vav}{alef}{nun}'                    ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // divan
      '{re}{mim}{alef}{nun}'                         ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // roman
      '{ze}{nun}{dal}{alef}{nun}'                    ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // zendan
      '{sin}{alef}{ze}{mim}{alef}{nun}'              ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // sazman
      '{sin}{lam}{ta}{alef}{nun}'                    ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // soltan
      '{gaf}{ye}{lam}{alef}{nun}'                    ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // Gilan
      '{ghaf}{heh}{re}{mim}{alef}{nun}'              ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // ghahramaan
      '{kaf}{re}{mim}{alef}{nun}'                    ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // Kerman
      '{khe}{alef}{nun}{dal}{alef}{nun}'             ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // khandan
      '{lam}{be}{nun}{alef}{nun}'                    ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // lobnan
      '{mim}{ye}{ze}{alef}{nun}'                     ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // mizan
      '{mim}{sin}{lam}{mim}{alef}{nun}'              ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // mosalman
      '{nun}{shin}{alef}{nun}'                       ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // neshan
      '{heh}{mim}{dal}{alef}{nun}'                   ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // hamedan
      '{ye}{vav}{nun}{alef}{nun}'                    ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // yunan
      '{kaf}{heh}{kaf}{shin}{alef}{nun}'             ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // kahkeshan (galaxy)
      '{aa}{te}{shin}{fe}{shin}{alef}{nun}'        ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // atashfeshan (volcano)
      '{pe}{re}{ye}{shin}{alef}{nun}'                ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // perishan (confused)
      '{dal}{re}{khe}{shin}{alef}{nun}'              ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // darakhshan (shining)
      '{heh}{mim}{ze}{mim}{alef}{nun}'              ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // hamzaman (simultaneous)
      '{sin}{alef}{khe}{te}{mim}{alef}{nun}'         ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // sakhteman (building)
      '{sin}{lam}{ye}{mim}{alef}{nun}'               ( atlimit set protect_lex_an ) // soleyman (Solomon)
    )
  )

  // --- Noun irregular rewrites (small hash table).
  //     Only include entries that actually change the buffer.
  define N_Hash as (
    [substring] among (
      '{alef}{khe}{be}{alef}{re}'      (<- '{khe}{be}{re}')
      '{khe}{vav}{alef}{sin}'          (<- '{khe}{alef}{sin}{heh}')
      '{alef}{sin}{alef}{te}{ye}{dal}' (<- '{alef}{sin}{te}{alef}{dal}')
    )
  )

  // --- Noun possessive suffixes (long + short clitics)
  define Noun_Possessive as (
    [substring] among (
      '{alef}{mim}'      ($(len > 4) delete) // -AM
      '{alef}{te}'       ($(len > 4) delete) // -AT
      '{alef}{shin}'     ($(len > 4) delete) // -ASH
      '{mim}{alef}{nun}' ( not protect_lex_an $(len > 5) delete) // -MAN
      '{te}{alef}{nun}'  ( not protect_lex_an $(len > 5) delete) // -TAN
      '{shin}{alef}{nun}'( not protect_lex_an $(len > 5) delete) // -SHAN

    )
  )

  // --- Noun plurals.
  //     -YAN and -GAN are productive; -AN is guarded by 'protect_lex_an' probe.
  define Noun_Plural as (
    [substring] among (
      '{ye}{alef}{nun}'     ( not protect_lex_an $(len > 5) delete) // -YAN
      '{gaf}{alef}{nun}'    ( not protect_lex_an $(len > 5) delete) // -GAN
      '{heh}{alef}{ye}'     ($(len > 5) delete)                 // -HAY
      '{alef}{nun}{ye}'     ($(len > 5) delete)                 // -ANI
      '{heh}{alef}'         ($(len > 4) delete)                 // -HA
      '{alef}{nun}'         ( not protect_lex_an $(len > 4) delete) // -AN (only if not lexical)
      '{ye}{nun}'           ($(len > 4) delete)                 // -IN
      '{alef}{te}'          ($(len > 4) delete)                 // -AT
    )
  )

  // --- Other derivational noun endings (conservative set).
  //     Order: longer patterns before shorter (e.g., -YAT before -Y).
  define Noun_Other as (
    [substring] among (
      '{gaf}{alef}{heh}'  ($(len > 5) delete) // -GAH
      '{be}{alef}{nun}'   ($(len > 5) delete) // -BAN
      '{gaf}{ye}'         ($(len > 4) delete) // -GI (abstract noun)
      '{ye}{te}'          ($(len > 4) delete) // -YAT
      '{ye}{ye}'          ($(len > 4) delete) // -YY (double Y)
    )
  )

  // --- Composite noun step (OR chain).
  define Stem_Noun as (
    N_Hash or Noun_Other or Noun_Plural or Noun_Possessive
  )

  // --- Adjective: comparative/superlative (HPS).
  define Adjective_Superlative_Comparative as (
    [substring] among (
      '{te}{re}{ye}{nun}' ($(len > 6) delete) // -TARIN
      '{te}{re}'          ($(len > 5) delete) // -TAR
    )
  )

  // --- Adjective derivational endings (HPS list + common variants).
  define Adjective_Derivational as (
    [substring] among (
      '{alef}{nun}{heh}'  ($(len > 5) delete) // -ANE
      '{mim}{nun}{dal}'   ($(len > 5) delete) // -MAND
      '{vav}{alef}{re}'   ($(len > 5) delete) // -VAR
      '{nun}{alef}{kaf}'  ($(len > 5) delete) // -NAK
      '{gaf}{alef}{re}'   ($(len > 5) delete) // -GAR
      '{ye}{nun}'         ($(len > 4) delete) // -IN
    )
  )

  // --- Adjective: relative -Y suffix.
  define Adjective_Relative as (
    [substring] among (
      '{ye}{ye}'  ($(len > 4) delete) // -YY
    )
  )

  // --- Composite adjective step (OR chain).
  define Stem_Adjective as (
    Adjective_Superlative_Comparative or
    Adjective_Derivational or
    Adjective_Relative
  )

  // --- Participle + person/aux clitic tails
  define Participle_Clitic_Tails as (
  [substring] among (
      '{alef}{ye}{dal}'  ($(len > 5) delete)
      '{alef}{ye}{mim}'  ($(len > 5) delete)
      '{alef}{nun}{dal}' ($(len > 5) delete)
      '{alef}{sin}{te}'  ($(len > 5) delete)
      '{alef}{sin}'      ($(len > 4) delete)
      '{alef}{ye}'       ($(len > 4) delete)
      '{ye}{dal}'        ($(len > 4) delete)
      '{ye}{mim}'        ($(len > 4) delete)
    )
  )

  // --- Verb: person/number endings
  define Verb_Person_Endings as (
    [substring] among (
      // Specific past-3sg stem fixes
      '{re}{fe}{te}{mim}'           (<- '{re}{fe}{te}')
      '{re}{fe}{te}{ye}'            (<- '{re}{fe}{te}')
      '{re}{fe}{te}{ye}{mim}'       (<- '{re}{fe}{te}')
      '{re}{fe}{te}{ye}{dal}'       (<- '{re}{fe}{te}')
      '{re}{fe}{te}{alef}{nun}{dal}'(<- '{re}{fe}{te}')
      // Generic person endings — only when a verb cue is active
      '{alef}{nun}{dal}' ( (saw_present_prefix or saw_inf_or_part) $(len > 5) delete ) // -AND
      '{ye}{dal}'        ( (saw_present_prefix or saw_inf_or_part) $(len > 4) delete ) // -ID
      '{ye}{mim}'        ( (saw_present_prefix or saw_inf_or_part) $(len > 4) delete ) // -IM
      '{alef}{mim}'      ( (saw_present_prefix or saw_inf_or_part) $(len > 4) delete ) // -AM
      '{dal}'            ( (saw_present_prefix or saw_inf_or_part) $(len > 3) delete ) // -D
      '{mim}'            ( (saw_present_prefix or saw_inf_or_part) $(len > 3) delete ) // -M
    )
  )

  // --- Verb: mood/tense markers (HPS).
  define Verb_Tense_Mood_Markers as (
    [substring] among (
      '{nun}{dal}{heh}'  ($(len > 5) delete set saw_inf_or_part) // agent noun -NDEH → present root
      '{heh}'            ( ( test '{dal}' or test '{te}' ) $(len > 2) delete set saw_inf_or_part) // past part. -ده/-ته
      '{alef}{nun}'      ( not protect_lex_an $(len > 4) delete set saw_inf_or_part) // infinitive -N / -AN
    )
  )

  // --- Composite verb step (OR chain).
  define Stem_Verb as (
    Participle_Clitic_Tails or
    Verb_Person_Endings or
    Verb_Tense_Mood_Markers
  )
)

// ============================================================================
//  MAIN (HPS pipeline)
//  - 1) Normalize script/spacing.
//  - 2) Strip all leading prefixes.
//  - 3) In each pass: try Noun; if Noun doesn't make a change try Adjective,
//       then Verb.
//  Invariants:
//    - After each outer iteration, either the buffer is shorter or unchanged.
// ============================================================================
define stem as (
  unset saw_present_prefix

  // 1) Normalize script/spacing (ZWNJ preserved for prefix detection)
  do Normalize_Characters

  // 2) Peel prefixes (forward, anchored; requires ZWNJ separator)
  repeat Strip_Prefix_At_Start

  // 2b) Delete remaining ZWNJs now that prefix detection is done
  do Delete_ZWNJ

  // 3) Peel suffixes (backward), one layer per pass
  backwards repeat test (
    unset saw_inf_or_part
    do Protect_Lexical_AN
    // HPS heuristic order when POS is unknown: Noun → Adjective → Verb
    Stem_Noun or Stem_Adjective or Stem_Verb
  )
)
